Wyoming, session 2025, HB0047.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-305(a) by creating a new
paragraph (viii) is amended to read:

9-1-305. Fees; amounts; collection; exceptions.

(a) The secretary of state shall collect the
following fees in advance for:

HB0047

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0081
(viii) Expediting the filing of any document
filed pursuant to title 17, title 34 or title 40, chapters
1 and 2 of the Wyoming statutes, a maximum of five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00). Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the secretary of state may charge a fee as
specified in this paragraph to expedite the filing of a
document filed with the secretary of state's office
pursuant to title 17, title 34 or title 40, chapters 1 and
2 of the Wyoming statutes upon the request of the filer.
The fee and process for requesting an expedited filing
shall be established by rule of the secretary of state
taking into account the cost of the filing fee, the costs
of expediting the filing and deadlines for response
required by law. The expedition of a filing shall not grant
any benefit over a nonexpedited filing for purposes of the
timing of filing.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0047